Georgia, session 2025_26, HB252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes" means all ad valorem taxes for municipal
purposes levied by, for, or on behalf of the City of Newnan, except for any ad valorem
taxes to pay interest on and to retire municipal bonded indebtedness.
H. B. 252 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 44 3027S
(2) "Base year" means the taxable year immediately preceding the taxable year in which
the exemption under subsection (b) of this section is first granted to the most recent
owner of such homestead.
(3) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended, with the additional qualification that it shall include not more
than five contiguous acres of homestead property.
(b) Each resident of the City of Newnan is granted an exemption on such person's homestead
from City of Newnan ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes in an amount equal to the
amount by which the current year assessed value of such homestead exceeds the base year
assessed value of such homestead. This exemption shall not apply to taxes assessed on
improvements to such homestead or additional land that is added to such homestead after
January 1 of the base year. If any real property is removed from such homestead, the base
year assessed value shall be adjusted to reflect such removal, and the exemption shall be
recalculated accordingly. The value of that property in excess of such exempted amount
shall remain subject to taxation.
(c) A person shall not receive the homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this
section unless such person or person's agent files an application with the governing authority
of the City of Newnan, or the designee thereof, providing such information relative to
receiving such exemption as will enable the governing authority of the City of Newnan, or
the designee thereof, to make a determination regarding the initial and continuing eligibility
of such person for such exemption. The governing authority of the City of Newnan, or the
designee thereof, shall provide application forms for this purpose.
(d) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies the residence as a homestead. After such person has filed the proper application as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
H. B. 252 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 44 3027S
thereafter for any year, and such exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any such person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b)
of this section to notify the governing authority of the City of Newnan, or the designee
thereof, in the event that such person for any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption.
(e)(1) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect
any state ad valorem taxes, county ad valorem taxes for county purposes, or county or
independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the homestead
exemption granted by subsection (b) of this Code section shall be in addition to and not
in lieu of any other homestead exemption applicable to ad valorem taxes.
(3) The homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not be
applied in addition to any other base year value homestead exemption provided by law
with respect to the given taxing jurisdiction to which the such law applies. In any such
event, the tax receiver or tax commissioner of the taxpayer's respective local government
or governments charged with the duty of receiving returns of property taxation shall
apply only the base year value homestead exemption that is larger or more beneficial for
the taxpayer with respect to the particular taxing jurisdictions to which more than one
base year value homestead exemption applies.
(f) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
H. B. 252 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 44 3027S
SECTION 3.
The municipal election superintendent of the City of Newnan shall call and conduct an
election as provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of
the City of Newnan for approval or rejection. The municipal election superintendent shall
conduct that election on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November of 2025 and shall
issue the call and conduct that election as provided by general law. The municipal election
superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week
for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Coweta
County. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from City
of Newnan ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes in an amount equal to
( ) NO the amount by which the current year assessed value of a homestead
exceeds the base year assessed value of such homestead?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by the City of Newnan. It shall
be the municipal election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary
of State. The provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the municipal election
superintendent and are not intended as directory. If the municipal election superintendent
fails or refuses to comply with this section, any elector of the City of Newnan may apply for
a writ of mandamus to compel the municipal election superintendent to perform his or her
duties under this section. If the court finds that the municipal election superintendent has not
complied with this section, the court shall fashion appropriate relief requiring the municipal
H. B. 252 (SUB)
- 4 -

LC 44 3027S
election superintendent to call and conduct such election on the date required by this section
or on the next date authorized for special elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540
of the O.C.G.A.
SECTION 4.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
SECTION 5.
100 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 252 (SUB)
- 5 -